District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

40-303.16a

Effect of failure to file notice.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, c. 854, § 1254a
as added Mar. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-84, § 2(d), 49 DCR 198
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-31, § 2(i), 52 DCR 7195